Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
CHAPTER 9 River and Harbor Development

Cross references.

Powers of State Properties Commission regarding leases authorizing dredging of bottom or bank of state-owned waterway, §

50-16-43(j)

.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this chapter, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 343 (2002).

52-9-1.
Projects for improving navigation channels.

The General Assembly recognizes the need for maintaining navigation inlets, harbors, and rivers to promote commercial and recreational uses of our coastal waters and their resources. The General Assembly further recognizes that dredging activities to deepen or maintain navigation channels within tidal inlets, as well as the entrances to harbors and rivers, often alter the natural drift of sand resources within the littoral zone. This alteration can be exacerbated when the sand resources are deposited in designated upland or offshore disposal areas instead of being returned to the natural river-sand transport-beach system. This alteration can adversely impact natural resources, recreation, tourism, and associated coastal economies. Moreover, the General Assembly believes in the duties of government to protect life and property. Therefore, it is the policy of this state that there shall be no net loss of sand from the state’s coastal barrier beaches resulting from dredging activities to deepen or maintain navigation channels within tidal inlets, as well as the entrances to harbors and rivers.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 516; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1516; Ga. L. 2002, p. 569, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 784, § 1.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Department of Natural Resources regarding rivers, §

12-5-331

.

52-9-2.
Disposal of sand and sediment originating from water navigation related projects.

With regard to all sand that is suitable for beach replenishment originating from the dredging of navigation channels within tidal inlets, as well as the entrances to harbors and rivers:

Such sand shall be used to replenish the adjacent coastal beaches, if feasible, either by deposition of sand into the nearshore littoral zone or direct placement on affected beaches;

If such sand is placed elsewhere, then a quality and quantity of sand from an alternate location necessary to mitigate any adverse effects caused by the dredging shall be used to replenish affected coastal beaches; provided, however, that this paragraph shall apply only where beach replenishment is necessary to mitigate effects from the dredging and dredged material removal from the natural river-sand transport-beach system of a specific project and beach replenishment from another source is the least costly environmentally sound mitigation option;

The disposition of sand shall be completed in cooperation with and, when required by applicable state or federal law, with the approval of the local governing authority and the Department of Natural Resources according to the requirements of Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 5 of Title 12, the “Shore Protection Act”; and

All such activities shall provide protection to coastal marshlands as defined in paragraph (3) of Code Section 12-5-282 and to nesting sea turtles and hatchlings and their habitats.

The Department of Natural Resources and the party undertaking the dredging shall coordinate to determine the option under subsection (a) of this Code section for beach replenishment that is most beneficial to the adjacent or affected coastal beaches, including, where applicable, identifying an alternate source of sand for purposes of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, after taking into consideration environmental impacts and any limitation of applicable state and federal law.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 516; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1516; Ga. L. 2002, p. 569, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 784, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 52/HB 95.

Cross references.

Authority of Department of Natural Resources to contract and make agreements, §

12-3-5

.